Vermont, session 2025-2026, H333.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A § 1502 is amended to read:
§ 1502. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(6) “Employee” includes any employee, and is not limited to the
employees of a particular employer unless this chapter explicitly states
otherwise, and includes any individual whose work has ceased as a
VT LEG #380682 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.333
2025 Page 2 of 2
consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or because of
any unfair labor practice and who has not obtained any other regular and
substantially equivalent employment, but does not include an individual:
(A) employed as an agricultural laborer; [Repealed.]
(B) employed by the individual’s parent or spouse;
(C) [Repealed.]
(D) having the status of an independent contractor;
(E) employed as a supervisor;
(F) employed by an employer subject to the Railway Labor Act,
45 U.S.C. §§ 151–165; or
(G) employed by any other person who is not an employer as defined
in subdivision (7) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380682 v.1